Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.395

Training programs on sexual harassment.

The director shall adopt rules establishing guidelines for policies, procedures, and mandatory training programs on sexual harassment for state employees to be adopted by state agencies. The department of enterprise services shall establish reporting requirements for state agencies on compliance with RCW 43.01.135.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 422; 2007 c 76 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.